District of Columbia statutes.
8-1861.01

Animal emergency preparedness plan.

Within 90 days of December 5, 2008, the Mayor shall establish an emergency preparedness plan for the protection, sheltering, and evacuation of domestic animals during and following a major disaster or emergency.

Dec. 5, 2008, D.C. Law 17-281, § 601, 55 DCR 9186